New York, session 2025-2026, S1482.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph a of subdivision 2 of section 2 11-0103 of the environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 47 3 of the laws of 1976, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) "Migratory game birds" means the Anatidae or waterfowl, commonly 5 known as geese, brant, swans and river and sea ducks; the Rallidae, 6 commonly known as rails, American coots, mud hens and gallinules; the 7 Limicolae or shorebirds, commonly known as woodcock, snipe, plover, 8 surfbirds, sandpipers, tattlers and curlews; the Corvidae, commonly 9 known as jays, crows and magpies; the Zenaida macroura, commonly known 10 as the mourning dove. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, 12 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 13 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 14 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04401-01-5